apertium-en-pl/apertium-en-pl.pl.dix.xml
          <l>tobie</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="akc"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nakc"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jemu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="akc"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jej</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nakc"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="nakc"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jemu</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="akc"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ja</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Ty</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ty</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Pan</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pan</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m1"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Pani</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>pani</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Panna</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>panna</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Panienka</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>panienka</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>my</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wy</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Panowie</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>panowie</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m1"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Państwo</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>państwo</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>Panie</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>panie</l>
          <r>prpers<s n="prn"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sie__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>siebie</l>
          <r>sieprn<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sobie</l>
          <r>sieprn<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>se</l>
          <r>sieprn<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>się</l>
          <r>sieprn<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sobą</l>
          <r>sieprn<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sobie</l>
          <r>sieprn<s n="prn"/><s n="ref"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kto__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kto</l>
          <r>ktoprn<s n="prn"/><s n="aff"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kogo</l>
          <r>ktoprn<s n="prn"/><s n="aff"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>komu</l>
          <r>ktoprn<s n="prn"/><s n="aff"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kogo</l>
          <r>ktoprn<s n="prn"/><s n="aff"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kim</l>
          <r>ktoprn<s n="prn"/><s n="aff"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kim</l>
          <r>ktoprn<s n="prn"/><s n="aff"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nikt</l>
          <r>ktoprn<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nikogo</l>
          <r>ktoprn<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nikomu</l>
          <r>ktoprn<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nikogo</l>
          <r>ktoprn<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nikim</l>
          <r>ktoprn<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nikim</l>
          <r>ktoprn<s n="prn"/><s n="neg"/><s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kto__base">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kto</l>
          <r>kto<s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kogo</l>
          <r>kto<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>komu</l>
          <r>kto<s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kogo</l>
          <r>kto<s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kim</l>
          <r>kto<s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>kim</l>
          <r>kto<s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/co__base">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>co</l>
          <r>co<s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czego</l>
          <r>co<s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czemu</l>
          <r>co<s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>co</l>
          <r>co<s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czym</l>
          <r>co<s n="inst"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>czym</l>
          <r>co<s n="locc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="kto"><i/><par n="kto__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="prsie"><i/><par n="sie__prn"/></e>
